Maryland, session 2026, HB1044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 3. POSTCONVICTION RELEASE.
5–301.
A COURT MAY NOT RELEASE A DEFENDANT AFTER CONVICTION PENDING
SENTENCING OR EXHAUSTION OF ANY APPELLATE REVIEW IF:
(1) THE DEFENDANT WAS CONVICTED OF:
(I) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1044*

HOUSE BILL 1044
(II) A VIOLATION OF § 3–602.1 (CHILD NEGLECT) OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE CRIME RESULTED IN THE DEATH OF A VICTIM UNDER THE
AGE OF 14 YEARS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.